apertium-mt-he.mt.dix
  <pardef n="b/ezzun__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ezzun</l><r>ezzun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ziezen</l><r>ezzun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="kax/xa__n_f">
    <e><p><l>xa</l><r>xa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ex</l><r>xa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ġ/ilda__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ilda</l><r>ilda<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>lud</l><r>ilda<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="t/ertuqa__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ertuqa</l><r>ertuqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rietaq</l><r>ertuqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/asġar__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>asġar</l><r>asġar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>saġar</l><r>asġar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ġ/olġol__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>olġol</l><r>olġol<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>lieġel</l><r>olġol<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="k/antun__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>antun</l><r>antun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>natan</l><r>antun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>naten</l><r>antun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="q/aws__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>aws</l><r>aws<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wies</l><r>aws<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="p/eċpuċa__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>eċpuċa</l><r>eċpuċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ċapaċ</l><r>eċpuċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ċiepeċ</l><r>eċpuċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/isluta__n_f">
    <e><p><l>isluta</l><r>isluta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>sielet</l><r>isluta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ġiżira/na__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>na</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>jjen</l><r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="z/opp__n_m">
    <e><p><l>opp</l><r>opp<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>opop</l><r>opp<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>pup</l><r>opp<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/orqom__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>orqom</l><r>orqom<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rieqam</l><r>orqom<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rieqem</l><r>orqom<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="x/itwa__n_f">
    <e><p><l>itwa</l><r>itwa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>tiewi</l><r>itwa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ż/inġla__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>inġla</l><r>inġla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>nieġel</l><r>inġla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="bir/ra__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ra</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>er</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="f/ardal__n_m">
    <e><p><l>ardal</l><r>ardal<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>radal</l><r>ardal<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="d/enb__n_m">
    <e><p><l>enb</l><r>enb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>nub</l><r>enb<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="q/awl__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>awl</l><r>awl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wiel</l><r>awl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="f/enek__n_m">
    <e><p><l>enek</l><r>enek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>niek</l><r>enek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="q/artalla__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>artalla</l><r>artalla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ratal</l><r>artalla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ratel</l><r>artalla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rietel</l><r>artalla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="t/rux__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>rux</l><r>rux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>orox</l><r>rux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħ/odon__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>odon</l><r>odon<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>dan</l><r>odon<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="t/ebgħa__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ebgħa</l><r>ebgħa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>bajja'</l><r>ebgħa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="m/ejda__n_f">
    <e><p><l>ejda</l><r>ejda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wejjed</l><r>ejda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="g/urbell__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>urbell</l><r>urbell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>riebel</l><r>urbell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ż/iemel__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>iemel</l><r>iemel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wiemel</l><r>iemel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="k/omma__n_f">
    <e><p><l>omma</l><r>omma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>miem</l><r>omma<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="p/erpura__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>erpura</l><r>erpura<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rapar</l><r>erpura<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>rieper</l><r>erpura<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="/armel__n_m">
    <e><p><l>armel</l><r>armel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>romol</l><r>armel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ż/elluma__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>elluma</l><r>elluma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>lielem</l><r>elluma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="fe/rfux__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>rfux</l><r>rfux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>friex</l><r>rfux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="boċ/ċa__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ċa</l><r>ċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>oċ</l><r>ċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="sp/iża__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>iża</l><r>iża<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ejjeż</l><r>iża<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħm/ar__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ir</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ke/wkba__n_f">
    <e><p><l>wkba</l><r>wkba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kwieb</l><r>wkba<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/alib__n_m">
    <e><p><l>alib</l><r>alib<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>laleb</l><r>alib<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="kar/kur__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>kur</l><r>kur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kra</l><r>kur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/astun__n_m">
    <e><p><l>astun</l><r>astun<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>saten</l><r>astun<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

    <e lm="perpura" c="scarecrow" ><i>p</i><par n="p/erpura__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="skwerra" c="set square" ><i>skwer</i><par n="bir/ra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="boċċa" c="marble" ><i>boċ</i><par n="boċ/ċa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="peċpuċa" c="worthless object" ><i>p</i><par n="p/eċpuċa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="spiża" c="expense" ><i>sp</i><par n="sp/iża__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bastun" c="walking stick" ><i>b</i><par n="b/astun__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="armel" c="widower" ><i></i><par n="/armel__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tertuqa" c="membrane" ><i>t</i><par n="t/ertuqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kaxxa" c="box" ><i>kax</i><par n="kax/xa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="karkur" c="slipper" ><i>kar</i><par n="kar/kur__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="misluta" c="earring" ><i>m</i><par n="m/isluta__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fardal" c="apron" ><i>f</i><par n="f/ardal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="masġar" c="wood" ><i>m</i><par n="m/asġar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="serra" c="hothouse" ><i>ser</i><par n="bir/ra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ferfux" c="rash person" ><i>fe</i><par n="fe/rfux__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="komma" c="sleeve" ><i>k</i><par n="k/omma__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ġolġol" c="small tinkling bell" ><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/olġol__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bezzun" c="bread roll" ><i>b</i><par n="b/ezzun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kantun" c="building stone" ><i>k</i><par n="k/antun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qawl" c="proverb" ><i>q</i><par n="q/awl__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qaws" c="bow" ><i>q</i><par n="q/aws__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="birra" c="beer" ><i>bir</i><par n="bir/ra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ħodon" c="an armful" ><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/odon__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mejda" c="table" ><i>m</i><par n="m/ejda__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="żiemel" c="horse" ><i>ż</i><par n="ż/iemel__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġenb" c="side" ><i>ġ</i><par n="d/enb__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zopp" c="lame person" ><i>z</i><par n="z/opp__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="borqom" c="caul" ><i>b</i><par n="b/orqom__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qartalla" c="large wicker basket" ><i>q</i><par n="q/artalla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħmar" c="donkey" ><i>ħm</i><par n="ħm/ar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="salib" c="crucifix" ><i>s</i><par n="s/alib__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="doċċa" c="shower" ><i>doċ</i><par n="boċ/ċa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġilda" c="leather" ><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/ilda__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xitwa" c="winter" ><i>x</i><par n="x/itwa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="trux" c="deaf" ><i>t</i><par n="t/rux__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tebgħa" c="stain" ><i>t</i><par n="t/ebgħa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="faxxa" c="bandage" ><i>fax</i><par n="kax/xa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fixxa" c="imitation coin" ><i>fix</i><par n="kax/xa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gurbell" c="type of fish" ><i>g</i><par n="g/urbell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kewkba" c="star" ><i>ke</i><par n="ke/wkba__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ġiżirana" c="necklace" ><i>ġiżira</i><par n="ġiżira/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="terra" c="powder" ><i>ter</i><par n="bir/ra__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="denb" c="tail" ><i>d</i><par n="d/enb__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="żinġla" c="large copper basin" ><i>ż</i><par n="ż/inġla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fenek" c="rabbit" ><i>f</i><par n="f/enek__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="żelluma" c="blunder" ><i>ż</i><par n="ż/elluma__n_GD"/></e>
